Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.110

Election method is alternative.

The method of annexation provided for in RCW 35A.14.015 through 35A.14.100 is an alternative method and is additional to the other methods provided for in this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.110.]